Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1074.01
Biological control, defined.

Biological control shall mean:

(1) The use by humans of living organisms to control or suppress undesirable animals, plants, or microorganisms which affect plants or plant pests; or

(2) The action of parasites, predators, pathogens, or competitive organisms on a host or prey population which affect plants or plant pests to produce a lower general equilibrium than would prevail in the absence of the biological control agents.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 3.